California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), if the Director of Finance determines that the State Board of Equalization has allocated more revenue to the Local Revenue Fund than required by subdivisions (a) and (b) for taxable sales that occurred during the period of July 1, 2011, to June 30, 2016, inclusive, the total amount of revenues credited to the Local Revenue Fund for this period shall be considered to have fulfilled the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b), and no allocation adjustment for this period shall be
 made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 25, Sec. 8.   (SB 90)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Section conditionally inoperative by its own provisions and by Stats. 1991, Ch. 91, Sec. 40, as amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 211.)
-------------------------------------------

6201.3.

In addition to the taxes imposed by Sections 6201, 6201.2, 6201.5, and any other provision of this part, an excise tax is hereby imposed on the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of tangible personal property purchased from any retailer on and after July 15, 1991, and purchased during any period in which this section is operative pursuant to Section 6201.4 at the rate of
 14 percent of the sales price of the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 140.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Tax is operative as provided in Section 6201.4.   Tax is conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Sections 6201.4 and 6201.45.)
-------------------------------------------

6201.4.

(a) Section 6201.3 shall be operative with respect to the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of tangible personal property purchased from any retailer on and after July 15, 1991, but shall cease to be operative during any period described in subdivision (c) or (d). 

(b) On or before November 1, 1993, and on or before every November 1 thereafter, the Director of Finance shall determine and certify to the
 Governor, the Legislature, and the board both of the following: 

(1) Whether the amount in the Special Fund for Economic Uncertainties, as established pursuant to Section 16418 of the Government Code, as of June 30 of the prior fiscal year exceeded 4 percent of General Fund revenues for that prior fiscal year. 

(2) Whether the estimated amount in the Special Fund for Economic Uncertainties as of June 30 of the current fiscal year (without inclusion of any revenue derived pursuant to Section 6201.3 on and after January 1 of the current fiscal year) exceeds 4 percent of General Fund revenues for the current fiscal year.

(c) Section 6201.3 shall cease to be operative on and after January 1, 1994, if on or before November 1, 1993, the Director of Finance certifies pursuant to subdivision (b) that both amounts certified
 pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of that subdivision exceed 4 percent of General Fund revenues for the respective fiscal year for which each amount is determined and certified. 

(d) Section 6201.3 shall cease to be operative on and after January 1 following any November 1 in which Section 6201.3 is operative and the Director of Finance certifies pursuant to subdivision (b) that both amounts certified pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of that subdivision exceed 4 percent of General Fund revenues for the respective fiscal year for which each amount is determined and certified.

(e) Section 6201.3 shall become operative on and after January 1 following any November 1 in which Section 6201.3 is inoperative and the Director of Finance certifies pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) that the estimated amount does not exceed 4 percent of the General Fund revenues as of June 30
 of the current fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 117, Sec. 7.   Effective July 16, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

6201.45.

Notwithstanding 6201.4 or any other provision of law, the state use tax rate in Section 6201.3 shall not be operative in any calendar year beginning on or after January 1, 2002, if the Director of Finance determines both of the following:

(a) The General Fund reserve is 3 percent of revenues excluding the revenues derived from the
 14 cent sales and use tax rate.

(b) Actual General Fund revenues for the period May 1 through September 30 equal or exceed the May Revision forecast, prior to the November 1 determination.

The Director of Finance shall make the determination on or before November 1 of each year.

The 14 cent reduction shall be operative for each calendar year commencing on the next January 1 after the determination is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 156, Sec. 2.   Effective August 7, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6201.5.

(a) In addition to the taxes imposed by Section 6201 and any other provision of this part, an excise tax is hereby imposed on the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of tangible personal property purchased from any retailer at the
 rate of one-quarter of 1 percent of the sales price of the property.

(b) All revenues, net of refunds, received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Fiscal Recovery Fund, as established pursuant to Section 99008 of the Government Code.

(c) Revenues received pursuant to this section accruing to the Fiscal Recovery Fund shall not be considered to be “State General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB” within the meaning of either Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution or Section 41202 of the Education Code.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2004, and shall cease to be operative on the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing more than 90 days following a notification to the
 board by the Director of Finance pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 99006 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 4.14.   Effective December 12, 2003.   Repealing and adding actions operative March 3, 2004, pursuant to Sec. 8 of Ch. 2.   Section operative July 1, 2004, by its own provisions.   Became inoperative on January 1, 2016, pursuant to its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6201.55.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 6010.5 and except as provided in subdivision (c), a retailer is relieved of the obligation to collect use tax on the sale or purchase of a digital product that is transferred electronically or accessed remotely if the following applies:

(1) (A) The sales price of digital products purchased by a purchaser from a retailer that are transferred electronically or accessed remotely exceeds five million dollars ($5,000,000) in the aggregate in the current calendar year, or beginning January 1, 2028, in the current or the preceding calendar year.

(B) The purchaser shall be responsible for reporting and paying the use tax to the
 department pursuant to subdivision (b) on the transaction that caused the purchaser to exceed the threshold specified in subparagraph (A) and any adjustments made pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) (A) On or before October 1, 2031, and every five years thereafter, the department shall multiply the amount specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) by the percentage increase in the California Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers between October 1, 2026, and the date of the calculation required by this subparagraph, and the result shall be rounded to the nearest one million dollars ($1,000,000) and shall be the applicable amount for the succeeding calendar year.

(B) The applicable amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be operative beginning January 1 of the succeeding calendar year, and four years thereafter, as an adjustment of the amount
 specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).

(b) If a retailer is relieved from the obligation to collect use tax pursuant to subdivision (a), the purchaser shall self-assess and pay directly to the department taxes due under this part, Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200), and, if otherwise applicable, Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) and Part 1.7 (commencing with Section 7280) on the transaction that caused the purchaser to exceed the threshold specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and any adjustments made pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(c) (1) If the department determines that it is necessary for the efficient administration of this part, the department may waive the requirement for the purchaser to self-assess and pay taxes due directly to the department under subdivision (b), and the retailer shall
 have an obligation to collect the use tax if the purchaser submits to the department a request for waiver in a form and manner prescribed by the department that includes all the places of business where the applicant expects to be a place of first use for purchases of digital products subject to subdivision (a).

(2) A purchaser that submits a request for waiver to the department under paragraph (1) shall also submit to the retailer all places of business where the purchaser expects to be a place of first use, which shall be considered the place of use for purposes of the use tax.

(d) A purchaser that is required to pay taxes to the department under subdivision (b) shall obtain a use tax direct payment permit pursuant to the procedures provided in Section 7051.3.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 14.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6201.6.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by Section 6201.5 the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of tangible personal property, other than fuel or petroleum products, by operators of aircraft to be used or consumed principally outside the county in which the sale is made and directly and exclusively in the use of the aircraft as common carriers of persons or property under the authority of the laws of this state, the United States, or any foreign government.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 13, Sec. 6.   Effective October 28, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6201.7.

(a) In addition to the taxes imposed by Section 6201 and any other provision of this part, an excise tax is hereby imposed on the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of tangible personal property purchased from any retailer for storage, use, or other consumption in this state, at the rate of 1 percent of the sales price of the property, on and after April 1,
 2009.

(b) This section shall cease to be operative on July 1, 2011, unless the Director of Finance makes the notification pursuant to Section 99040 of the Government Code, in which case this section shall cease to be operative on July 1, 2012.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 18, Sec. 3.   Effective February 20, 2009.   Inoperative on July 1, 2011, or July 1, 2013, as provided in subd. (b).)
-------------------------------------------

6201.8.

(a) Except as provided by Section 6357.3, in addition to the taxes imposed by this part, an excise tax is hereby imposed on the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of diesel fuel, as defined in Section 60022, at the rate of 1.75 percent of the sales price of the diesel fuel.

(b) Except as provided by Section 6357.3, in
 addition to the taxes imposed by this part and by subdivision (a), commencing November 1, 2017, an excise tax is hereby imposed on the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of diesel fuel, as defined in Section 60022, at the rate of 4 percent of the sales price of the diesel fuel.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 7102, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2), all of the revenues, less refunds, collected pursuant to this section shall be estimated by the State Board of Equalization, with the concurrence of the Department of Finance, and transferred quarterly to the Public Transportation Account in the State Transportation Fund for allocation pursuant to Section 99312.1 of the Public Utilities Code.

(2) The revenues, less refunds, attributable to a rate of 0.5 percent of the 4-percent increase in the rate pursuant to
 subdivision (b), amounting to one-eighth of revenues from the increase in the rate under that subdivision, shall be estimated by the State Board of Equalization, with the concurrence of the Department of Finance, and transferred quarterly to the Public Transportation Account in the State Transportation Fund for allocation by the Transportation Agency to intercity rail and commuter rail purposes pursuant to Section 99312.3 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 24.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6202.

(a) Every person storing, using, or otherwise consuming in this state tangible personal property purchased from a retailer is liable for the tax. His or her liability is not extinguished until the tax has been paid to this state except that a receipt from a retailer engaged in business in this state or from a retailer who is authorized by the board, under the rules and regulations as it may prescribe, to collect the tax and who is, for the purposes of this part relating to the use tax, regarded as a retailer engaged in business in this
 state, given to the purchaser pursuant to Section 6203, is sufficient to relieve the purchaser from further liability for the tax to which the receipt refers.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision, when a person purchases a vessel or aircraft from another person through a broker, the purchaser’s liability for use tax is relieved if the purchaser has paid an amount as sales or use tax to the broker, and the purchaser obtains and retains a receipt from the broker showing the payment of that tax to the broker.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision, when a person purchases a vessel or aircraft from another person through a broker, if the broker collects from the purchaser an amount as sales or use tax, the broker shall be liable for that amount under Section 6204 as if the broker were a retailer engaged in business in this state required to collect that amount as use tax from the
 purchaser, and that amount constitutes a debt owed by the broker to this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 6.5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

6202.5.

Any retailer, other than a nonprofit zoological society as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 6010.50, that stores, uses, or otherwise consumes in this state endangered or threatened animal or plant species, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6010.50, acquired through a trade or exchange with a nonprofit zoological society, shall be liable for the use tax.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 124, Sec. 99.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

6202.7.

Any retailer who loans any motor vehicle to any employee of the University of California or the California State University shall be liable for the use tax on the loan of that vehicle equal to the amount of tax that would have applied if the vehicle had been leased at fair rental value for a time period equal to the period the vehicle is loaned to the university or state university employee, provided that all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The vehicle is for the employee’s exclusive
 use.

(b) The loan of the vehicle has been approved by the chancellor of the university or the president of the state university.

(c) It is demonstrated that the loan of the vehicle is not dependent upon the retailer receiving any automotive-related business from the university or the state university.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   Effective August 19, 1996.   Operative January 1, 1997, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 366.)
-------------------------------------------

6203.

(a) Except as provided by Sections 6292 and 6293, every retailer engaged in business in this state and making sales of tangible personal property for storage, use, or other consumption in this state, not exempted under Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 6271) or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 6351), shall, at the time of making the sales or, if the storage,
 use, or other consumption of the tangible personal property is not then taxable hereunder, at the time the storage, use, or other consumption becomes taxable, collect the tax from the purchaser and give to the purchaser a receipt therefor in the manner and form prescribed by the board.

(b) As respects leases constituting sales of tangible personal property, the tax shall be collected from the lessee at the time amounts are paid by the lessee under the lease.

(c) “Retailer engaged in business in this state” as used in this section and Section 6202 means and includes any of the following:

(1) Any retailer maintaining, occupying, or using, permanently or temporarily, directly or indirectly, or through a subsidiary, or agent, by whatever name called, an office, place of distribution, sales or sample room or place,
 warehouse or storage place, or other place of business.

(2) Any retailer having any representative, agent, salesperson, canvasser, independent contractor, or solicitor operating in this state under the authority of the retailer or its subsidiary for the purpose of selling, delivering, installing, assembling, or the taking of orders for any tangible personal property.

(3) As respects a lease, any retailer deriving rentals from a lease of tangible personal property situated in this state.

(4) (A) Any retailer soliciting orders for tangible personal property by mail if the solicitations are substantial and recurring and if the retailer benefits from any banking, financing, debt collection, telecommunication, or marketing activities occurring in this state or benefits from the location in this state
 of authorized installation, servicing, or repair facilities.

(B) This paragraph shall become operative upon the enactment of any congressional act that authorizes states to compel the collection of state sales and use taxes by out-of-state retailers.

(5) Notwithstanding Section 7262, a retailer specified in paragraph (4), and not specified in paragraph (1), (2), or (3), is a “retailer engaged in business in this state” for the purposes of this part and Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200) only.

(d) (1) For purposes of this section, “engaged in business in this state” does not include the taking of orders from customers in this state through a computer telecommunications network located in this state which is not directly or indirectly owned by the retailer when the orders result from the
 electronic display of products on that same network. The exclusion provided by this subdivision shall apply only to a computer telecommunications network that consists substantially of online communications services other than the displaying and taking of orders for products.

(2) This subdivision shall become inoperative upon the operative date of provisions of a congressional act that authorize states to compel the collection of state sales and use taxes by out-of-state retailers.

(e) Except as provided in this subdivision, a retailer is not a “retailer engaged in business in this state” under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) if that retailer’s sole physical presence in this state is to engage in convention and trade show activities as described in Section 513(d)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, and if the retailer, including any of its representatives, agents, salespersons,
 canvassers, independent contractors, or solicitors, does not engage in those convention and trade show activities for more than 15 days, in whole or in part, in this state during any 12-month period and did not derive more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of net income from those activities in this state during the prior calendar year. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, a retailer engaging in convention and trade show activities, as described in Section 513(d)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, is a “retailer engaged in business in this state,” and is liable for collection of the applicable use tax, with respect to any sale of tangible personal property occurring at the convention and trade show activities and with respect to any sale of tangible personal property made pursuant to an order taken at or during those convention and trade show activities.

(f) Any limitations created by this section upon the definition of “retailer
 engaged in business in this state” shall apply only for purposes of tax liability under this code. Nothing in this section is intended to affect or limit, in any way, civil liability or jurisdiction under Section 410.10 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   (AB 155)   Effective September 23, 2011.   Became inoperative on September 15, 2012, pursuant to Sec. 6 of Ch. 313.   See later operative version amended by Sec. 3 of Stats. 2019, Ch. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

6203.

(a) Except as provided by Sections 6292 and 6293, every retailer engaged in business in this state and making sales of tangible personal property for storage, use, or other consumption in this state, not exempted under Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 6271) or Chapter
 4 (commencing with Section 6351), shall, at the time of making the sales or, if the storage, use, or other consumption of the tangible personal property is not then taxable hereunder, at the time the storage, use, or other consumption becomes taxable, collect the tax from the purchaser and give to the purchaser a receipt therefor in the manner and form prescribed by the department.

(b) As respects leases constituting sales of tangible personal property, the tax shall be collected from the lessee at the time amounts are paid by the lessee under the lease.

(c) “Retailer engaged in business in this state” as used in this section and Section 6202 means any retailer that has substantial nexus with this state for purposes of the commerce clause of the United States Constitution and any retailer upon whom federal law permits this state to impose a use tax collection duty. “Retailer
 engaged in business in this state” specifically includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Any retailer maintaining, occupying, or using, permanently or temporarily, directly or indirectly, or through a subsidiary, or agent, by whatever name called, an office, place of distribution, sales or sample room or place, warehouse or storage place, or other place of business.

(2) Any retailer having any representative, agent, salesperson, canvasser, independent contractor, or solicitor operating in this state under the authority of the retailer or its subsidiary for the purpose of selling, delivering, installing, assembling, or the taking of orders for any tangible personal property.

(3) As respects a lease, any retailer deriving rentals from a lease of tangible personal property situated in this state.

(4) (A) Any retailer that, in the preceding calendar year or the current calendar year, has total combined sales of tangible personal property for delivery in this state by the retailer and all persons related to the retailer that exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(B) For purposes of this section, a person is related to another person if both persons are related to each other pursuant to Section 267(b) of the Internal Revenue Code and the regulations thereunder.

(d) Except as provided in this subdivision, a retailer is not a “retailer engaged in business in this state” under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) if that retailer’s sole physical presence in this state is to engage in convention and trade show activities as described in Section 513(d)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, and
 if the retailer, including any of the retailer’s representatives, agents, salespersons, canvassers, independent contractors, or solicitors, does not engage in those convention and trade show activities for more than 15 days, in whole or in part, in this state during any 12-month period and did not derive more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of net income from those activities in this state during the prior calendar year. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, a retailer engaging in convention and trade show activities, as described in Section 513(d)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, is a “retailer engaged in business in this state,” and is liable for collection of the applicable use tax, with respect to any sale of tangible personal property occurring at the convention and trade show activities and with respect to any sale of tangible personal property made pursuant to an order taken at or during those convention and trade show activities.

(e) Any limitations created by this section upon the definition of “retailer engaged in business in this state” shall only apply for purposes of tax liability under this code. Nothing in this section is intended to affect or limit, in any way, civil liability or jurisdiction under Section 410.10 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(f) (1) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 5 of the Statutes of 2019 shall become operative on April 1, 2019.

(2) If the amendments made to this section by Chapter 5 of the Statutes of 2019 are held in a final decision of a court of competent jurisdiction to violate the substantial nexus standard of the commerce clause of the United States Constitution, this section shall become inoperative and shall be repealed on the date of that final decision.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 5, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2019, Ch. 34, Sec. 5.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2019.   Repealed conditionally by its own provisions.    See later version added by Sec. 4 of Stats. 2019, Ch. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

6203.

(a) Except as provided by Sections 6292 and 6293, every retailer engaged in business in this state and making sales of tangible personal property for storage, use, or other consumption in this state, not exempted under Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 6271) or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 6351), shall, at the time of making the sales or, if the storage, use, or other consumption of the tangible personal property is not then taxable hereunder, at the time the storage, use, or other consumption becomes taxable, collect the tax from the purchaser and give to the purchaser a receipt therefor in the manner and form prescribed by the department.

(b) As respects leases constituting sales of tangible
 personal property, the tax shall be collected from the lessee at the time amounts are paid by the lessee under the lease.

(c) “Retailer engaged in business in this state” as used in this section and Section 6202 means any retailer that has substantial nexus with this state for purposes of the commerce clause of the United States Constitution and any retailer upon whom federal law permits this state to impose a use tax collection duty. “Retailer engaged in business in this state” specifically includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Any retailer maintaining, occupying, or using, permanently or temporarily, directly or indirectly, or through a subsidiary, or agent, by whatever name called, an office, place of distribution, sales or sample room or place, warehouse or storage place, or other place of business.

(2) Any retailer having any representative, agent, salesperson, canvasser, independent contractor, or solicitor operating in this state under the authority of the retailer or its subsidiary for the purpose of selling, delivering, installing, assembling, or the taking of orders for any tangible personal property.

(3) As respects a lease, any retailer deriving rentals from a lease of tangible personal property situated in this state.

(4) Any retailer that is a member of a commonly controlled group, as defined in Section 25105, and is a member of a combined reporting group, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 25106.5 of Title 18 of the California Code of Regulations, that includes another member of the retailer’s commonly controlled group that, pursuant to an agreement with or in cooperation with the
 retailer, performs services in this state in connection with tangible personal property to be sold by the retailer, including, but not limited to, design and development of tangible personal property sold by the retailer, or the solicitation of sales of tangible personal property on behalf of the retailer.

(5) (A) Any retailer entering into an agreement or agreements under which a person or persons in this state, for a commission or other consideration, directly or indirectly refer potential purchasers of tangible personal property to the retailer, whether by an internet-based link or an internet website, or otherwise, provided that both of the following conditions are met:

(i) The total cumulative sales price from all of the retailer’s sales, within the preceding 12 months, of tangible personal property to purchasers in this state that are referred pursuant
 to all of those agreements with a person or persons in this state, is in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(ii) The retailer, within the preceding 12 months, has total cumulative sales of tangible personal property to purchasers in this state in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(B) An agreement under which a retailer purchases advertisements from a person or persons in this state, to be delivered on television, radio, in print, on the internet, or by any other medium, is not an agreement described in subparagraph (A), unless the advertisement revenue paid to the person or persons in this state consists of commissions or other consideration that is based upon sales of tangible personal property.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B), an agreement under which a retailer engages a person in this state
 to place an advertisement on an internet website operated by that person, or operated by another person in this state, is not an agreement described in subparagraph (A), unless the person entering the agreement with the retailer also directly or indirectly solicits potential customers in this state through use of flyers, newsletters, telephone calls, electronic mail, blogs, microblogs, social networking sites, or other means of direct or indirect solicitation specifically targeted at potential customers in this state.

(D) For purposes of this paragraph, “retailer” includes an entity affiliated with a retailer within the meaning of Section 1504 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(E) This paragraph shall not apply if the retailer can demonstrate that the person in this state with whom the retailer has an agreement did not engage in referrals in the state on behalf of the retailer that
 would satisfy the requirements of the commerce clause of the United States Constitution.

(d) Except as provided in this subdivision, a retailer is not a “retailer engaged in business in this state” under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) if that retailer’s sole physical presence in this state is to engage in convention and trade show activities as described in Section 513(d)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, and if the retailer, including any of the retailer’s representatives, agents, salespersons, canvassers, independent contractors, or solicitors, does not engage in those convention and trade show activities for more than 15 days, in whole or in part, in this state during any 12-month period and did not derive more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of net income from those activities in this state during the prior calendar year. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, a retailer engaging in convention and trade show activities, as
 described in Section 513(d)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, is a “retailer engaged in business in this state,” and is liable for collection of the applicable use tax, with respect to any sale of tangible personal property occurring at the convention and trade show activities and with respect to any sale of tangible personal property made pursuant to an order taken at or during those convention and trade show activities.

(e) Any limitations created by this section upon the definition of “retailer engaged in business in this state” shall only apply for purposes of tax liability under this code. Nothing in this section is intended to affect or limit, in any way, civil liability or jurisdiction under Section 410.10 of the Code of Civil Procedure. 

(f) If the amendments to Section 6203, as added by Section 3 of Chapter 313 of the Statutes of 2011, made by the act adding this
 section are held in a final decision of a court of competent jurisdiction to violate the substantial nexus standard of the commerce clause of the United States Constitution, this section shall become operative on the date of that final decision.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 5, Sec. 4.   (AB 147)   Effective April 25, 2019.   Section conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6203.1.

(a) The department, in its discretion, may relieve a retailer engaged in business in this state that meets the requirements of subdivision (b) of the following:

(1) The penalties provided by Sections 6484, 6511, and 6591.

(2) All or any part of the interest imposed on the person by this
 part.

(b) This section shall apply to any retailer engaged in business in this state that meets all of the following conditions:

(1) The retailer registered under Article 2 (commencing with Section 6225) on or after April 1, 2019, as a retailer engaged in business pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 6203.

(2) The total combined sales from the retailer and all persons related to the retailer, within the preceding 12 months, of tangible personal property in this state or for delivery in this state does not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(3) The retailer was not previously registered, or required to be registered, with the department under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 6051) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section
 6201).

(4) The retailer’s failure to collect and remit use tax was due to a good faith error and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect.

(5) The retailer is not a marketplace facilitator as defined in Section 6041.

(6) Any other factors as deemed necessary by the department.

(c) For purposes of this section, a person is related to another person if both persons are related to each other pursuant to Section 267(b) of the Internal Revenue Code and the regulations thereunder.

(d) The department may grant relief only for interest or penalties imposed on use tax liabilities due and payable for tax reporting periods beginning April 1, 2019, and
 ending December 31, 2022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 34, Sec. 6.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6203.5.

(a) (1) A retailer is relieved from liability to collect use tax that became due and payable, insofar as the measure of the tax is represented by accounts that have been found to be worthless and charged off for income tax purposes by the retailer or, if the retailer is not required to file income tax returns, charged off in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A retailer that has previously paid the amount of the tax may, under rules and regulations prescribed by the department, take as a deduction the amount found worthless and charged off by the retailer. If these accounts are thereafter in whole or in part collected by the retailer, the amount collected shall be included in the first return filed after the collection and the amount of the tax shall be paid with the return.

(2) (A) Before January 1, 2025, for purposes of this subdivision, the term “retailer” shall include any entity affiliated with the retailer under Section 1504 of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(B) An entity that is a retailer under this paragraph shall not be entitled to a deduction under paragraph (1) on or after January 1, 2025.

(b) (1) In the case of accounts held by a lender, a retailer or lender that makes a proper election under paragraph (4) shall be entitled to a deduction or refund of the tax that the retailer has previously reported and paid if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) A deduction was not previously claimed or allowed on any portion of the accounts.

(B) The accounts have been found worthless and written off by the lender in accordance with the requirements of subdivision (a) before January 1, 2025.

(C) The contract between the retailer and the lender contains an irrevocable relinquishment of all rights to the account from the retailer to the lender.

(D) The retailer remitted the tax on or after January 1, 2000.

(E) The party electing to claim the deduction or refund under paragraph (4) files a claim in a manner prescribed by the department.

(2) If the retailer or the lender thereafter collects in whole or in part any accounts, one of the following shall apply:

(A) If the retailer is entitled to the deduction or refund under the election specified in paragraph (4), the retailer shall include the amount collected in its first return filed after the collection and pay tax on that amount with the return.

(B) If the lender is entitled to the deduction or refund under the election specified in paragraph (4), the lender shall pay the tax to the department in accordance with Section 6451.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the term “lender” means any of the following:

(A) Any person that holds a retail account which that person purchased directly from a retailer who reported the tax.

(B) Any person that holds a retail account pursuant to that person’s contract directly with the retailer that reported the tax.

(C) Any person that is either an affiliated entity, under Section 1504 of Title 26 of the United States Code, of a person described in subparagraph (A) or (B), or an assignee of a person described in subparagraph (A) or
 (B).

(4) For purposes of this section, a “proper election” shall be established when the retailer that reported the tax and the lender prepare and retain an election form, signed by both parties, designating which party is entitled to claim the deduction or refund. This election may not be amended or revoked unless a new election, signed by both parties, is prepared and retained by the retailer and the lender.

(c) This section shall remain operative until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 34, Sec. 11.   (SB 167)   Effective June 27, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 12 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

6203.5.
